Louisiana, session 2026, HB178.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 843 is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 843. Recording of proceedings
In felony cases, in cases involving violation of an ordinance enacted pursuant
to R.S. 14:143(B), and on motion of the court, the state, or the defendant in other
misdemeanor cases tried in a district, parish, or city court, the court, the clerk, or
court stenographer shall record all of the proceedings, including the examination of
prospective jurors, the testimony of witnesses, statements, rulings, orders, and
charges by the court, and objections, questions, statements, and arguments of
counsel.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-822 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 178